Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-206
Supervisor districts; cities and villages.

In the event any city having one thousand inhabitants or more shall have enough inhabitants to form one supervisor district, then such city shall constitute one district, or in case the number of inhabitants is less than the number in the other districts, then so much contiguous territory shall be added to such city to give it sufficient inhabitants for one supervisor district. Villages may be enumerated with general districts, counting all the inhabitants therein as being within the districts wherein such town or village is situated; Provided, no village, or any part thereof, shall be included in or made a part of any supervisor district containing a city having one thousand inhabitants or more, or containing any part of such city.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 6, p. 133;

R.S.1913, § 992;

Laws 1917, c. 17, § 2, p. 82;

C.S.1922, § 892;

C.S.1929, § 26-206;

R.S.1943, § 23-206.